Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5226
Actuarial certification, defined.

Actuarial certification shall mean a written statement by a member of the American Academy of Actuaries or other individual acceptable to the director that a small employer carrier is in compliance with the provisions of section 44-5258 based upon the person's examination and including a review of the appropriate records and the actuarial assumptions and methods used by the small employer carrier in establishing premium rates for applicable health benefit plans.

Laws 1994, LB 1222, § 4.